Florida, session 2026, SB1024.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âParagraphs (a), (n), and (aa) of subsection (6) 17 of section 627.351, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 18 627.351âInsurance risk apportionment plans.â 19 (6)âCITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.â 20 (a)âThe public purpose of this subsection is to ensure that 21 there is an orderly market for property insurance for residents 22 and businesses of this state. 23 1.âThe Legislature finds that private insurers are 24 unwilling or unable to provide affordable property insurance 25 coverage in this state to the extent sought and needed. The 26 absence of affordable property insurance threatens the public 27 health, safety, and welfare and likewise threatens the economic 28 health of the state. The state therefore has a compelling public 29 interest and a public purpose to assist in assuring that 30 property in the state is insured and that it is insured at 31 affordable rates so as to facilitate the remediation, 32 reconstruction, and replacement of damaged or destroyed property 33 in order to reduce or avoid the negative effects otherwise 34 resulting to the public health, safety, and welfare, to the 35 economy of the state, and to the revenues of the state and local 36 governments which are needed to provide for the public welfare. 37 It is necessary, therefore, to provide affordable property 38 insurance to applicants who are in good faith entitled to 39 procure insurance through the voluntary market but are unable to 40 do so. The Legislature intends, therefore, that affordable 41 property insurance be provided and that it continue to be 42 provided, as long as necessary, through Citizens Property 43 Insurance Corporation, a government entity that is an integral 44 part of the state, and that is not a private insurance company. 45 To that end, the corporation shall strive to increase the 46 availability of affordable property insurance in this state, 47 while achieving efficiencies and economies, and while providing 48 service to policyholders, applicants, and agents which is no 49 less than the quality generally provided in the voluntary 50 market, for the achievement of the foregoing public purposes. 51 Because it is essential for this government entity to have the 52 maximum financial resources to pay claims following a 53 catastrophic hurricane, it is the intent of the Legislature that 54 the corporation continue to be an integral part of the state and 55 that the income of the corporation be exempt from federal income 56 taxation and that interest on the debt obligations issued by the 57 corporation be exempt from federal income taxation. 58 2.âThe Residential Property and Casualty Joint Underwriting 59 Association originally created by this statute shall be known as 60 the Citizens Property Insurance Corporation. The corporation 61 shall provide insurance for residential and commercial property, 62 for applicants who are entitled, but, in good faith, are unable 63 to procure insurance through the voluntary market. The 64 corporation shall operate pursuant to a plan of operation 65 approved by order of the Financial Services Commission. The plan 66 is subject to continuous review by the commission. The 67 commission may, by order, withdraw approval of all or part of a 68 plan if the commission determines that conditions have changed 69 since approval was granted and that the purposes of the plan 70 require changes in the plan. For the purposes of this 71 subsection, residential coverage includes both personal lines 72 residential coverage, which consists of the type of coverage 73 provided by homeowner, mobile home owner, dwelling, tenant, 74 condominium unit owner, and similar policies; and commercial 75 lines residential coverage, which consists of the type of 76 coverage provided by condominium association, apartment 77 building, and similar policies. 78 3.âWith respect to coverage for personal lines residential 79 structures: 80 a.âEffective January 1, 2017, a structure that has a 81 dwelling replacement cost of $700,000 or more, or a single 82 condominium unit that has a combined dwelling and contents 83 replacement cost of $700,000 or more, is not eligible for 84 coverage by the corporation. 85 b.âThe requirements of sub-subparagraph a. do not apply in 86 counties where the office determines there is not a reasonable 87 degree of competition. In such counties a personal lines 88 residential structure that has a dwelling replacement cost of 89 less than $1.5 $1 million, or a single condominium unit that has 90 a combined dwelling and contents replacement cost of less than 91 $1 million, is eligible for coverage by the corporation. 92 4.âIt is the intent of the Legislature that policyholders, 93 applicants, and agents of the corporation receive service and 94 treatment of the highest possible level but never less than that 95 generally provided in the voluntary market. It is also intended 96 that the corporation be held to service standards no less than 97 those applied to insurers in the voluntary market by the office 98 with respect to responsiveness, timeliness, customer courtesy, 99 and overall dealings with policyholders, applicants, or agents 100 of the corporation. 101 5.a.âEffective January 1, 2009, a personal lines 102 residential structure that is located in the âwind-borne debris 103 region,â as defined in s. 1609.2, International Building Code 104 (2006), and that has an insured value on the structure of 105 $750,000 or more is not eligible for coverage by the corporation 106 unless the structure has opening protections as required under 107 the Florida Building Code for a newly constructed residential 108 structure in that area. A residential structure is deemed to 109 comply with this sub-subparagraph if it has shutters or opening 110 protections on all openings and if such opening protections 111 complied with the Florida Building Code at the time they were 112 installed. 113 b.âAny major structure, as defined in s. 161.54(6)(a), that 114 is newly constructed, or rebuilt, repaired, restored, or 115 remodeled to increase the total square footage of finished area 116 by more than 25 percent, pursuant to a permit applied for after 117 July 1, 2015, is not eligible for coverage by the corporation if 118 the structure is seaward of the coastal construction control 119 line established pursuant to s. 161.053 or is within the Coastal 120 Barrier Resources System as designated by 16 U.S.C. ss. 3501 121 3510. 122 6.âWith respect to wind-only coverage for commercial lines 123 residential condominiums, effective July 1, 2014, a condominium 124 shall be deemed ineligible for coverage if 50 percent or more of 125 the units are rented more than eight times in a calendar year 126 for a rental agreement period of less than 30 days. 127 (n)1.âRates for coverage provided by the corporation must 128 be actuarially sound pursuant to s. 627.062 and not competitive 129 with approved rates charged in the admitted voluntary market so 130 that the corporation functions as a residual market mechanism to 131 provide insurance only when insurance cannot be procured in the 132 voluntary market, except as otherwise provided in this 133 paragraph. The office shall provide the corporation such 134 information as would be necessary to determine whether rates are 135 competitive. The corporation shall file its recommended rates 136 with the office at least annually. The corporation shall provide 137 any additional information regarding the rates which the office 138 requires. The office shall consider the recommendations of the 139 board and issue a final order establishing the rates for the 140 corporation within 45 days after the recommended rates are 141 filed. The corporation may not pursue an administrative 142 challenge or judicial review of the final order of the office. 143 2.âIn addition to the rates otherwise determined pursuant 144 to this paragraph, the corporation shall impose and collect an 145 amount equal to the premium tax provided in s. 624.509 to 146 augment the financial resources of the corporation. 147 3.âAfter the public hurricane loss-projection model under 148 s. 627.06281 has been found to be accurate and reliable by the 149 Florida Commission on Hurricane Loss Projection Methodology, the 150 model shall be considered when establishing the windstorm 151 portion of the corporationâs rates. The corporation may use the 152 public model results in combination with the results of private 153 models to calculate rates for the windstorm portion of the 154 corporationâs rates. This subparagraph does not require or allow 155 the corporation to adopt rates lower than the rates otherwise 156 required or allowed by this paragraph. 157 4.âThe corporation must make a recommended actuarially 158 sound rate filing for each personal and commercial line of 159 business it writes. 160 5.âNotwithstanding the boardâs recommended rates and the 161 officeâs final order regarding the corporationâs filed rates 162 under subparagraph 1., the corporation shall annually implement 163 a rate increase which, except for sinkhole coverage, does not 164 exceed the following for any single policy issued by the 165 corporation, excluding coverage changes and surcharges: 166 a.âTwelve percent for 2023. 167 b.âThirteen percent for 2024. 168 c.âFourteen percent for 2025. 169 d.âFifteen percent for 2026 and all subsequent years. 170 6.âIn a county in which the office determines there is not 171 a reasonable degree of competition, the corporation shall 172 annually implement a rate increase that does not exceed 10 173 percent for any single policy issued by the corporation. 174 7.6.âThe corporation may also implement an increase to 175 reflect the effect on the corporation of the cash buildup factor 176 pursuant to s. 215.555(5)(b). 177 8.7.âThe corporationâs implementation of rates as 178 prescribed in subparagraphs 5. and 9. 8. shall cease for any 179 line of business written by the corporation upon the 180 corporationâs implementation of actuarially sound rates. 181 Thereafter, the corporation shall annually make a recommended 182 actuarially sound rate filing that is not competitive with 183 approved rates in the admitted voluntary market for each 184 commercial and personal line of business the corporation writes. 185 9.8.âNew or renewal personal lines policies that do not 186 cover a primary residence are not subject to the rate increase 187 limitations in subparagraph 5., but may not be charged more than 188 50 percent above, nor less than, the prior yearâs established 189 rate for the corporation. 190 10.9.âAs used in this paragraph, the term âprimary 191 residenceâ means the dwelling that is the policyholderâs primary 192 home or is a rental property that is the primary home of the 193 tenant, and which the policyholder or tenant occupies for more 194 than 9 months of each year. 195 (aa)âExcept as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the 196 corporation shall require the securing and maintaining of flood 197 insurance as a condition of coverage of a personal lines 198 residential risk. The insured or applicant must execute a form 199 approved by the office affirming that flood insurance is not 200 provided by the corporation and that if flood insurance is not 201 secured by the applicant or insured from an insurer other than 202 the corporation and in addition to coverage by the corporation, 203 the risk will not be eligible for coverage by the corporation. 204 The corporation may deny coverage of a personal lines 205 residential risk to an applicant or insured who refuses to 206 secure and maintain flood insurance. The requirement to purchase 207 flood insurance shall be implemented as follows: 208 1.âExcept as provided in subparagraphs 2. and 3., all 209 personal lines residential policyholders must have flood 210 coverage in place for policies effective on or after: 211 a.âJanuary 1, 2024, for a structure that has a dwelling 212 replacement cost of $600,000 or more. 213 b.âJanuary 1, 2025, for a structure that has a dwelling 214 replacement cost of $500,000 or more. 215 c.âJanuary 1, 2026, for a structure that has a dwelling 216 replacement cost of $400,000 or more. 217 d.âJanuary 1, 2027, for all other personal lines 218 residential property insured by the corporation. 219 2.âAll personal lines residential policyholders whose 220 property insured by the corporation is located within the 221 special flood hazard area defined by the Federal Emergency 222 Management Agency must have flood coverage in place: 223 a.âAt the time of initial policy issuance for all new 224 personal lines residential policies issued by the corporation on 225 or after April 1, 2023. 226 b.âBy the time of the policy renewal for all personal lines 227 residential policies renewing on or after July 1, 2023. 228 3.âPolicyholders are not required to purchase flood 229 insurance as a condition for maintaining the following policies 230 issued by the corporation: 231 a.âPolicies that do not provide coverage for the peril of 232 wind. 233 b.âPolicies that provide coverage under a condominium unit 234 owners form. 235 c.âPolicies that provide coverage in Zone X as designated 236 by the Federal Emergency Management Agency or for structures 237 that are elevated at least 1 foot above the flood zoneâs minimum 238 base flood elevation, if the office determines there is not a 239 reasonable degree of competition in such zone or for such 240 structures. 241 242 The flood insurance required under this paragraph must meet, at 243 a minimum, the dwelling coverage available from the National 244 Flood Insurance Program or the requirements of s. 245 627.715(1)(a)1., 2., and 3. 246 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.